District of Columbia statutes.
22-4235

Administrative support.

(a)

There are authorized such funds as may be necessary to support the CJCC.

(b)

The CJCC is authorized to hire staff and to obtain appropriate office space, equipment, materials, and services necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

(b-1)

Notwithstanding the provisions of Unit A of Chapter 14 of Title 2, each qualified District resident applicant shall receive an additional 10-point preference over a qualified non-District resident applicant for all positions within the CJCC unless the applicant declines the preference. This 10-point preference shall be in addition to, and not instead of, qualifications established for the position. All persons hired after February 6, 2008, shall submit proof of residency upon employment in a manner determined by the CJCC[.] An applicant claiming the hiring preference under this section shall agree in writing to maintain bona fide District residency for a period of 7 consecutive years from the effective date of hire and shall provide proof of such residency annually to the director of personnel for the CJCC for the first 7 years of employment. Failure to maintain District residency for the consecutive 7-year period shall result in forfeiture of employment. The CJCC shall submit to the Mayor and Council annual reports detailing the names of all new employees and their pay schedules, titles, and place of residence.

(c)

The CJCC shall serve as the personnel authority for all employees of the CJCC. The CJCC shall exercise this authority consistent with Chapter 6 of Title 1.

(d)

The CJCC may exercise procurement authority to carry out the responsibilities of the CJCC, including contracting and contract oversight. The CJCC shall exercise this authority consistent with Chapter 3A of Title 2 [§ 2-351.01 et seq.], except § 2-352.01(a) shall not apply.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1506, 48 DCR 6981
Feb. 6, 2008, D.C. Law 17-108, § 211, 54 DCR 10993
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 214, 59 DCR 6190
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1406 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “consistent with Chapter 3A of Title 2; except that § 2-352.01(a) shall not apply” for “consistent with Unit A of Chapter 3 of Title 2, except with regard to the powers and duties outlined in § 2-301.05(a), (b), (c), and (e)” in (d).
D.C. Law 17-108 added subsec. (b-1).